North Carolina, session 2025, SB1053.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 110-103 reads as rewritten:
"§ 110-103. Criminal penalty.
…
(b) It shall be a Class I felony for anyAny person who operates a child care facility to:
(1) Willfully violateand (i) willfully violates the provisions of G.S. 110-99(a), or
(2) Willfully violate(ii) willfully violates the provisions of this Article while
providing child care for three or more children, for more than four hours per
day on two consecutive days.days, shall be subject to the following criminal
penalties:
(1) For a first offense under this subsection, the person shall be guilty of a Class
A1 misdemeanor.
(2) For a second or subsequent offense under this subsection, or where the
violation poses a substantial risk of harm to a child, the district attorney, in the
exercise of prosecutorial discretion, may charge the violation as a Class I
felony. In exercising this discretion, the district attorney shall consider the
nature and circumstances of the violation, the number of children placed at
risk, the history of prior violations, and whether the operator took prompt
corrective action.
(b1) Nothing in subsection (b) of this section limits the authority of the Department to
pursue civil or administrative remedies concurrently with or in lieu of criminal prosecution.
…."
*S1053-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to implement
the following:
(1) Update enforcement protocols, internal policy guidance, and staff training
materials to reflect the revised criminal penalty structure under
G.S. 110-103(b), as enacted by this act, including the reclassification of first
offenses as Class A1 misdemeanors and the criteria applicable to Class I
felony charging decisions for second or subsequent offenses.
(2) Develop and disseminate guidance to child care facility operators and the
public regarding the revised penalty structure, including the factors a district
attorney may consider in exercising prosecutorial discretion under
G.S. 110-103(b)(2), as enacted by Section 1 of this act.
(3) Coordinate with the Department of Justice and the Administrative Office of
the Courts to ensure consistent implementation of the revised penalty
structure.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to implement the following:
(1) Update charging instruments, case management systems, and related forms to
reflect the revised classification of offenses under G.S. 110-103(b), as enacted
by Section 1 of this act.
(2) Provide notice and guidance to district attorneys, clerks of superior court, and
other relevant court personnel regarding the revised penalty structure, the
discretionary felony charging criteria, and the effective date of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to violations
occurring on or after that date. This act does not affect the prosecution or punishment of a person
for an offense committed before the effective date of this act.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1053-First Edition